New York, session 2025-2026, A2730.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 224-d of the labor law, as added 2 by chapter 375 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 8. [Any] A covered renewable energy system shall require all contrac- 4 tors and subcontractors performing construction work to use apprentice- 5 ship agreements, as defined by article twenty-three of this chapter, and 6 any thermal energy network covered by this section shall additionally 7 require [all] such contractors and subcontractors [performing 8 construction work] to use [apprenticeship agreements, as defined by 9 article twenty-three of this chapter, with] pre-apprenticeship direct 10 entry providers registered with the department. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05508-02-5